South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S348.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - South Carolina State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors, relating to Units of Credit, designated as Regulation Document Number 5310, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors proposes to amend R.49-201 to correct a scrivener's error. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on July 26, 2024. ----XX----